Wyoming, session 2025, SF0140.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-2-308 is created to read:

23-2-308. Trapper education required; exceptions.

SF0140

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0227
(a) Except as otherwise authorized by law or rule of
the commission, no person born on and after January 1,
2000, shall take any wildlife by the use of any trap or
snare on land other than that of the person's own family,
unless the person possesses or can demonstrate they have
obtained a certificate of trapper education approved by the
department.

(b) Any person who has not received a certificate of
trapper education as provided by subsection (a) of this
section may apply to the department for a special
authorization to take wildlife by the use of any trap or
snare while being accompanied by a person who has attained
the age of majority, acting as a mentor, who possesses or
can demonstrate they have obtained a certificate of trapper
education, unless otherwise exempted, and who possesses a
valid Wyoming hunting license. A mentor shall not provide
supervision for more than one (1) person, other than
immediate family members, at any one (1) time. The special
authorization shall be valid for not more than one (1)
year. A person may reapply or renew the special
authorization as provided by this section and pursuant to
rule of the commission.
SF0140

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0227

(c) The commission shall promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the purposes of this section.

Section 2. W.S. 23-2-303(a)(intro) and 23-3-103(a)
are amended to read:

23-2-303. Trapping licenses; tagging; traps and
snares; penalty; confiscation; inspection; interference
with trapping.

(a) Any person who qualifies under W.S. 23-2-308 may,
in the discretion of the department upon application and
the payment of the proper fee, receive a license to trap
any furbearing animal. The department shall issue a
trapping license to a nonresident only if his state issues
licenses to Wyoming residents to trap the same species for
which residents of that state may be licensed to trap in
that state. Any nonresident applying for a Wyoming trapping
license shall furnish:

SF0140

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0227
23-3-103. Taking predatory animals, predacious birds
and trophy animals; taking furbearing animals and game
birds without license prohibited.

(a) Predatory animals and predacious birds may be
taken without a license in any manner and at any time
except as provided by W.S. 23-2-303(d) and (e), 23-2-308,
23-3-112, 23-3-304(b), 23-3-305, 23-3-306(b) and 23-3-307.
The department shall report annually to the Wyoming
department of agriculture the number of predatory animals
and predacious birds taken by the department's animal
damage control agents, and include in the report the area
where taken and the control method used.

Section 3. The game and fish commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement the provisions
of this act not later than January 1, 2026.

SF0140

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0227
Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0140